Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62J.901] FAIR PHARMACY REIMBURSEMENT. new text end new text begin (a) To improve patient access to pharmacy services and support the financial viability of community pharmacies for any prescription drug dispensed by a community pharmacy, the total reimbursement to the community pharmacy shall be no less than: new text end new text begin (1) the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost (NADAC) or, if NADAC is unavailable, the Wholesale Acquisition Cost (WAC); and new text end new text begin (2) a professional dispensing fee as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 13e, adjusted biennially based on an independent cost-of-dispensing survey to ensure fair compensation and reflect inflation, labor costs, and operational expenses. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section shall require reimbursement at or above NADAC or WAC for covered entities participating in the federal 340B program, as defined in United States Code, title 42, section 256b. Reimbursement for 340B-purchased drugs shall be determined in accordance with federal and state law. new text end new text begin (b) Below-cost reimbursements and negative reimbursement adjustments for community pharmacies are prohibited. These include the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) pharmacy benefit managers (PBMs) and managed care organizations (MCOs) must minimally reimburse community pharmacies at or above the reimbursement standard in this section without applying any direct or indirect reductions; new text end new text begin (2) a PBM or MCO shall not impose negative reimbursement adjustments by imposing fees of any type, including transaction fees, recoupments, adjustments, or reimbursement reductions that result in a pharmacy receiving less than the total reimbursement required under this section for any prescription; new text end new text begin (3) parity in reimbursement between community pharmacies and PBM-owned and affiliated pharmacies. PBMs may not reimburse PBM-owned or affiliated pharmacies at a higher rate than community pharmacies for the same drug, patient, and plan conditions; and new text end new text begin (4) there shall be no direct or indirect fees that reduce net reimbursement. PBMs must not impose direct or indirect fees, transaction charges, network access fees, or adjustments that lower the community pharmacy's net reimbursement below the required reimbursement standard in paragraph (a). new text end